Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4205.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 1111. As used in this act:
(a) "Qualified premises" means a tasting room, as that term is
defined in section 113 of the Michigan liquor control code of 1998,
1998 PA 58, MCL 436.1113.
(b) (a) "Raw agricultural commodity" means any food in its raw
or natural state including fruits that are washed, colored, or
otherwise treated in their unpeeled natural form before marketing.
(c) (b) "Regulatory authority" means the department, the local
health department, or the authorized representative having
RMH H00704'25 (H-1) negqtc


jurisdiction over the food establishment.
(d) (c) "Retail food establishment" means an operation that
sells or offers to sell food directly to a consumer. Retail food
establishment includes both a retail grocery and a food service
establishment, but does not include a food processor.
(e) (d) "Retail grocery" means an operation that sells or
offers to sell food to consumers for off-premises consumption. Food
for off-premises consumption does not include take-out food
intended for immediate consumption.
(f) (e) "Rules" means administrative rules promulgated under
this act pursuant to in accordance with the administrative
procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328.
(g) (f) "Shellfish dealer" means an interstate wholesaler
handling shellfish.
(h) (g) "Shellfish dealer certification" means the issuance of
a numbered certificate to a person indicating that indicates that
the person is in compliance with the requirements of the guide for
the control of molluscan shellfish and that the person has
permission from the department to conduct 1 or more of the
following shellfish activities, as defined in the guide for the
control of molluscan shellfish:
(i) Shellstock shipper.
(ii) Shucker packer.
(iii) Repacker or reshipper.
(i) (h) "Smoked fish rules" means R 285.569.1 to R 285.569.19
of the Michigan Administrative Code.
(j) (i) "Special transitory food unit" means a temporary food
establishment that is licensed to operate throughout the this state
without the 14-day limits or a mobile food establishment that is
RMH H00704'25 (H-1) negqtc


not required to return to a commissary.
(k) (j) "Staple foods" does not include accessory foods, such
as coffee, tea, cocoa, soda, noncarbonated drinks, such as sports
drinks, punches, and flavored waters, candy, condiments, spices,
hot foods, or foods ready to go or made to take out, such as
prepared sandwiches or salads.
(l) (k) "Sulfiting agents" means any of the following:
(i) Sulfur dioxide.
(ii) Sodium sulfite.
(iii) Sodium bisulfite.
(iv) Potassium bisulfite.
(v) Sodium metabisulfite.
(vi) Potassium metabisulfite.
(m) (l) "Temporary food establishment" means a food
establishment that operates at a fixed location for a temporary
period not to exceed 14 consecutive days.
(n) (m) "Temporary license" means a written authorization
issued by the director to operate for a specified limited time
period.
(o) (n) "Transient tenant" means a person an individual who
rents a room in a bed and breakfast for fewer than 30 consecutive
days.
(p) (o) "Trimming" means removing leaves, roots, and other
extraneous materials in preparation for grading, sorting, and sale
as a whole fruit or vegetable. Trimming does not remove the peel or
core and does not further cut the whole fruit or vegetable.
(q) (p) "U.S. standards for shell eggs" means "United States
Standards, Grades, and Weight Classes for Shell Eggs", AMS 56 (July
20, 2000), United States Department of Agriculture.
RMH H00704'25 (H-1) negqtc


(r) (q) "Vending company base location" means a vending
machine location or other food establishment required to be
separately licensed under section 4105(5).
(s) (r) "Vending machine" means a self-service device that,
upon insertion of after inserting a coin, paper currency, token,
card, or key, or by manual operation, dispenses a unit servings
serving of food in bulk or in packages a package without the
necessity of replenishing the device between each vending
operation. Vending machine does not include any of the following:
(i) A device that dispenses only bottled or canned soft drinks;
other packaged nonperishable foods or beverages; or bulk ball gum,
nuts, and panned candies.
(ii) A water-dispensing water dispensing machine that is
registered under chapter IV.section 4115.
(t) (s) "Vending machine location" means the room, enclosure,
space, or area in which 1 or more vending machines are installed
and operated, or a micro market.
(u) (t) "Wholesale" means selling other than directly to
consumers.
(v) (u) "Wild game" means animals from their natural state and
not cultivated, domesticated, or tamed.
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless House Bill No. ____ (request no. H00703'25) of the 103rd
Legislature is enacted into law.
Final Page
RMH H00704'25 (H-1) negqtc